Alaska, session 34, SB161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 16.10 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 16.10.135. Use of trawl or dredge fishing gear. A person may not use, 06 employ, or operate any trawl or dredge fishing gear that makes substantial bottom 07 contact with the seafloor while in use, as determined by the department, in the water of 08 the state. 09 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 10 read: 11 STUDY AND REPORT ON THE EFFECTS OF BOTTOM TRAWLING AND ON 12 THE CONDITION OF THE SEAFLOOR. The Department of Fish and Game shall conduct a 13 comprehensive study of the health of seafloor ecosystems and fish habitat in state water. The 14 department shall submit a report on the results of the department's study under this section to 01 the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives on or before January 1, 02 2027, and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report must include 03 (1) information as to how the state's fishery resource and seafloor marine 04 ecosystems have been, and may continue to be, affected by the use of trawl or dredge fishing 05 gear that makes substantial bottom contact with the seafloor while in use; 06 (2) to the extent available, the quantities of fishery resources taken as bycatch 07 by fishers using trawl or dredge fishing gear that makes substantial bottom contact with the 08 seafloor while in use, including the number of fish of each species, taken over the last 10 09 years; and 10 (3) recommendations as to whether the use of trawl or dredge fishing gear that 11 makes substantial bottom contact with the seafloor while in use should be prohibited or 12 otherwise limited for 13 (A) the maximum benefit of the state's people; and 14 (B) the sustained yield of the state's fishery resource. 15 * Sec. 3. Section 1 of this Act takes effect January 1, 2028. 16 * Sec. 4. Except as provided in sec. 3 of this Act, this Act takes effect immediately under 17 AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.